Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.140

Mileage allowance—Jurors—Witnesses.

No allowance of mileage shall be made to a juror or witness who has not verified his or her claim of mileage under oath before the clerk of the court on which he or she is in attendance.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1004; 1895 c 10 s 2; RRS s 498, part. Formerly RCW 10.01.130, part.]